North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-18.1 Teacher Certification

15.1-18.1-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the education standards and practices board.

“Certification” means national board certification as provided by the national board.

“National board” means the national board for professional teaching standards.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 158, § 1.

15.1-18.1-02.
National board certification program — Recertification — Board duties.

The board shall:

Inform teachers of the national board certification program and the scholarships and services the national board provides to teachers seeking certification.

Collect and review in the order received scholarship applications from individuals who are licensed to teach by the board or approved to teach by the board.

Approve no more than seventeen applications per year under this subsection;

During each year of the biennium, reserve three of the available scholarships under this subsection until October first for individuals teaching at low-performing schools. At that time, the three slots, if not filled, become available to all other applicants;

Require the recipient for a scholarship under this subsection to serve during the school year as a full-time classroom teacher in a public or nonpublic school in this state; and

If available, require the recipient for a scholarship under this subsection to participate in mentoring programs developed and implemented in the employing school or school district.

Ensure that all scholarship recipients under this subsection receive adequate information regarding the level of commitment required to acquire certification.

The board shall collect and review in the order received scholarship applications for national board recertification from individuals who are licensed to teach by the board or approved to teach by the board and:

Approve no more than three scholarship applications per year under this subsection;

Require each recipient for a scholarship under this subsection to serve during the school year as a full-time classroom teacher in a public or nonpublic school in this state; and

If available, require each recipient for a scholarship under this subsection to participate in mentoring programs developed and implemented in the employing school or school district.

If any individual who receives a scholarship under this section does not complete the certification process within the time allotted by the board, the individual must reimburse the state an amount equal to one-half of the amount awarded to the individual as a scholarship.

At the conclusion of each school year after an individual receives national board certification, the board shall pay to an individual an additional one thousand five hundred dollars for the life of the national board certificate if:

The individual was employed during the school year as a full-time classroom teacher by a school district in this state; and

The individual participated in any efforts of the employing school district to develop and implement teacher mentoring programs.

A contract negotiated under chapter 15.1-16 may not preclude or limit the ability of a school district or any other entity, public or private, from providing any remuneration to a teacher who has obtained national board certification. Any remuneration received by a teacher as a consequence of having obtained national board certification is in addition to any other compensation otherwise payable as a result of any contract negotiated under chapter 15.1-16.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 158, § 2; 2005, ch. 163, § 10; 2007, ch. 171, § 2; 2013, ch. 13, § 30.